Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.420

County or intermediate district superintendent and board employees to terminate or transfer employment—Benefits retained.

As of July 1, 1969, employees of the various offices of county or intermediate district superintendent and county or intermediate district board shall terminate their employment therein, or such employees, at their election, may transfer their employment to the new intermediate school district in which their respective county is located. If such employment is so transferred, each employee shall retain the same leave benefits and other benefits that he or she had in his or her previous position. If the intermediate school district has a different system of computing leave benefits and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted the same leave and other benefits as a person will receive who would have had similar occupational status and total years of service with the new intermediate school district.

[ 1990 c 33 s 290; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 22. Formerly RCW 28A.21.210, 28.19.600.]

NOTES:

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.